Washington statutes.
RCW 19.86.100

Assurance of discontinuance of prohibited act—Approval of court—Not considered admission.

In the enforcement of this chapter, the attorney general may accept an assurance of discontinuance of any act or practice deemed in violation of this chapter, from any person engaging in, or who has engaged in, such act or practice. Any such assurance shall be in writing and be filed with and subject to the approval of the superior court of the county in which the alleged violator resides or has his or her principal place of business, or in Thurston county.

Such assurance of discontinuance shall not be considered an admission of a violation for any purpose; however, proof of failure to comply with the assurance of discontinuance shall be prima facie evidence of a violation of this chapter.

[ 2011 c 336 s 556; 1970 ex.s. c 26 s 3; 1961 c 216 s 10.]